Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,216
Rules of civil procedure; costs; judgment; appeal.

In all suits brought under the State Tort Claims Act, the district courts shall follow the rules of civil procedure applicable to private litigants, and costs shall be allowed in all courts to the successful claimant to the same extent as if the state was a private litigant. Judgments shall be subject to appeal in the same manner as other judgments of the district court.

Laws 1969, c. 756, § 8, p. 2848;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 27;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 148.

As part of the civil procedure applicable to suits brought under the State Tort Claims Act, a district court is authorized, under appropriate circumstances, to change the venue of the proceedings or otherwise transfer the site for trial. Blitzkie v. State, 228 Neb. 409, 422 N.W.2d 773 (1988).